Florida, session 2026, HB131.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 733.501, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
733.501 Curators.—
(1) APPOINTMENT OF A CURATOR.—When it is necessary, the
court may appoint a curator after formal notice to the person
apparently entitled to letters of administration as follows:
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb131 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 131 2026 Legislature
(a) The court may appoint a curator at any time with
notice to other interested persons as the court deems
appropriate. The curator may be authorized to perform any duty
or function of a personal representative.
(b) If there is significant great danger that any of the
decedent's property is likely to be wasted, destroyed, or
removed beyond the jurisdiction of the court and if the
appointment of a curator would be delayed by giving notice, the
court may appoint a curator without giving notice to other
interested persons.
(c) In any other proper case, the court may appoint a
curator when deemed necessary to protect the interests of the
estate or a decedent's heirs.
(2) BOND REQUIREMENTS.—Unless waived by the court,
curators must post a reasonable bond in an amount to shall be
determined by required of the curator as the court deems
necessary. However, bonds are not No bond shall be required for
of banks and trust companies that serve as curators.
(3) COMPENSATION.—Curators are shall be allowed reasonable
compensation for their services, and the court may consider the
provisions of s. 733.617.
(4) REMOVAL AND SURCHARGE.—Curators are shall be subject
to removal and surcharge by the court.
(5) COURT REVIEW.—
(a) The curator shall file reports with the court when the
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb131 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 131 2026 Legislature
court deems it necessary. Such reports must detail the actions
taken by the curator in managing the estate. The court shall
review such reports to ensure that the curator is effectively
managing the estate and fulfilling its duties.
(b) The court may require more frequent reporting or
additional documentation as it deems necessary to protect the
interests of the estate.
Section 2. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
made by this act to section 733.501, Florida Statutes, in a
reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 90.5021, Florida
Statutes, is reenacted to read:
90.5021 Fiduciary lawyer-client privilege.—
(1) For the purpose of this section, a client acts as a
fiduciary when serving as a personal representative or a trustee
as defined in ss. 731.201 and 736.0103, an administrator ad
litem as described in s. 733.308, a curator as described in s.
733.501, a guardian or guardian ad litem as defined in s.
744.102, a conservator as defined in s. 710.102, or an attorney
in fact as described in chapter 709.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb131 -01-er